Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 28.11 The Rhode Island Cannabis Act
21-28.11-7.
Licensed cannabis cultivators.

Except as provided pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section or §

21-28.11-8

, there shall be a moratorium on the issuance of new cannabis cultivator licenses until the date that is two (2) years following the final issuance of the commission’s rules and regulations pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. This moratorium shall not apply to cannabis cultivators licensed pursuant to chapter 28.6 of this title on or before enactment of this chapter.

On August 1, 2022 and thereafter, any medical marijuana cultivator licensed or approved pursuant to the provisions of §

21-28.6-16

, upon payment of an additional license fee, shall be permitted to cultivate, manufacture and process cannabis as a hybrid cannabis cultivator for both adult use and medical use. The amount of the additional license fee shall be determined by the office of cannabis regulation during the transitional period established by §

21-28.11-10

and shall be subject to review by the commission pursuant to the final rules and regulations. The fee shall be deposited in the social equity fund established in §

21-28.11-31

. Sale of the cultivated cannabis shall be made directly to a licensee pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and chapter 28.6 of this title, subject to the following conditions:

The cultivator must be in good standing and maintain the cultivator license pursuant to the provisions of chapter 28.6 of this title; and

The cultivator must make good faith efforts to ensure the adult use cannabis production portion of the cultivation operation has no significant adverse effect on the medical marijuana program and patient needs.

During the moratorium pursuant to this section, the commission, with the assistance of the advisory board, as required, shall submit a report to the general assembly which evaluates the cultivation of adult use and medical cannabis. The report shall consider factors, including, but not limited to:

Cultivation and production history;

Tax payment history;

Existing inventory and inventory history;

Sales contracts;

Current and future projected market conditions; and

Any other factors relevant to ensuring responsible cultivation, production, and inventory management for both medical and adult use cannabis.

Upon expiration of the moratorium pursuant to this section, the commission may adopt rules and regulations authorizing issuance of additional cultivator licenses; provided, however, a new cultivator licensee’s canopy shall not exceed ten thousand square feet (10,000 ft2). In determining whether to issue additional cultivator licenses, the cannabis control commission shall consider the findings of the report submitted pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

For the purposes of this section, “canopy” means the total surface area within a cultivation area that is dedicated to the cultivation of mature cannabis plants. The surface area of the canopy must be calculated in square feet and measured using the outside boundaries of the area and must include all of the area within the boundaries. If the surface area of the canopy consists of noncontiguous areas, each component area must be separated by identifiable boundaries. If a tiered or shelving system is used in the cultivation area, the surface area of each tier or shelf must be included in calculating the area of the canopy. The canopy does not include the areas within the cultivation area that are used to cultivate immature cannabis plants and seedlings and that are not used at any time to cultivate mature cannabis plants.

To qualify for issuance of any cannabis cultivator license under subsection (d) of this section, an applicant shall satisfy all requirements and qualifications established by the commission to include but not limited to, the following:

Apply for a license in a manner prescribed by the commission;

Provide proof that the applicant is twenty-one (21) years of age or older and is a resident of the state;

Undergo a criminal record background check pursuant to §

21-28.11-12.1

and on any terms established by the commission;

Provide proof that the applicant is current with and in compliance with all obligations required by the division of taxation, including filings and payment of taxes;

Has provided a nonrefundable application fee as determined by the commission;

Shall consent and be subject to inspections by the commission for the purposes of ensuring and enforcing compliance with this chapter and all rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter; and

Prior to the issuance of any license and for any period of renewal, the applicant shall submit an annual license fee pursuant to subsection (b) of this section to be deposited in the social equity fund established in §

21-28.11-31

.

The commission may determine and adjust the application fee or annual license fee pursuant to the commission’s rulemaking authority and in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

Every individual cannabis plant possessed by a licensed cannabis cultivator shall be catalogued in a seed-to-sale inventory tracking system. The commission shall review the current seed-to-sale tracking system utilized pursuant to chapter 28.6 of this title and promulgate new or additional regulations, as it deems appropriate. As of December 1, 2022, any cannabis tags issued to provide seed-to-sale inventory and tracking shall be issued without charge to patient cardholders and/or primary caregivers authorized to grow medical cannabis.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the general laws, the manufacture of cannabis using a solvent extraction process that includes the use of a compressed, flammable gas as a solvent by a licensed cannabis cultivator shall not be subject to the protections of this chapter.

Cannabis cultivators shall sell cannabis only to an entity licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or chapter 28.6 of this title.

Cannabis cultivators shall be licensed to grow cannabis only at a location or locations registered with and approved by the cannabis commission. The commission may promulgate regulations governing locations where cultivators are authorized to grow. Cannabis cultivators shall abide by all local ordinances, including zoning ordinances.

As a condition of licensing, cannabis cultivators shall consent and be subject to inspection by the commission for the purposes of ensuring and enforcing compliance with this chapter and chapter 28.6 of this title, all rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, and the provisions of §

28-5.1-14

.

Persons issued cultivator licenses shall be subject to the following:

A licensed cannabis cultivator shall notify and request approval from the commission of any change in his or her name or address within ten (10) days of the change. A licensed cannabis cultivator who fails to notify the commission of any of these changes commits shall be subject to an administrative fine of no more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150), or other penalty as determined by the commission.

When a licensed cannabis cultivator notifies the commission of any changes listed in this subsection, the commission shall issue the licensed cannabis cultivator a new license identification document after the commission approves the changes and receives from the licensee payment of a fee specified in regulations.

If a licensed cannabis cultivator loses his or her license or certification document, he or she shall notify the commission and submit a fee specified in regulation within ten (10) days of losing the document. The commission shall issue a new license document with a new random identification number, upon receipt of payment of a fee promulgated in the rules and regulations not to exceed the amount of one hundred dollars ($100).

A licensed cannabis cultivator has a continuing duty to notify the commission of any criminal conviction(s) that occurs after the issuance of a license or registration. A criminal conviction may not automatically result in suspension or revocation of a license, but shall be subject to §

21-28.11-12.1

. The commission may suspend and/or revoke his or her license after the notification, pending a final determination of disqualification pursuant to §

21-28.11-12.1

.

If a licensed cannabis cultivator violates any provision of this chapter or regulations promulgated hereunder as determined by the commission, his or her issued license may be suspended and/or revoked.

Immunity.

No licensed cannabis cultivator shall be subject to: arrest; prosecution; search or seizure, except as authorized pursuant to §§

21-28.11-20

and

21-28.11-27

and subsection (f)(6) of this section; or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or entity, solely for acting in accordance with this chapter, chapter 28.6 of this title and rules and regulations promulgated by the commission.

No principal officers, board members, agents, volunteers, or employees of a licensed cannabis cultivator shall be subject to arrest; prosecution; search or seizure, except as authorized pursuant to §§

21-28.11-20

and

21-28.11-27

and subsection (f)(6) of this section; or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or entity, solely for working for or with a licensed cannabis cultivator to engage in acts permitted by this chapter, chapter 28.6 of this title and rules and regulations promulgated by the commission.

No state employee or commission member shall be subject to arrest; prosecution; search or seizure, except as authorized pursuant to §§ 21-28.11-20 and 21-28.11-27; or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty, disciplinary action, termination, or loss of employee or pension benefits, for any and all conduct that occurs within the scope of his or her employment regarding the administration, execution, and/or enforcement of this chapter, chapter 28.6 of this title and rules and regulations promulgated by the commission, and the provisions of §§

9-31-8

and

9-31-9

shall be applicable to this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing a cannabis cultivator to transfer or sell cannabis directly to a consumer. A direct sale or transfer from a cannabis cultivator to a consumer is prohibited and shall be grounds for revocation of license and criminal prosecution.

A cannabis cultivator and all agents and employees of the cannabis cultivator shall comply with all rules adopted by the commission and other applicable laws.

No cannabis or cannabis product shall be sold or otherwise marketed pursuant to this chapter that has not first been tested by a cannabis testing laboratory and determined to meet the commission’s testing protocols issued pursuant to §

21-28.11-11

. Cannabis cultivators shall be subject to any regulations promulgated by the commission that specify how marijuana shall be tested, including, but not limited to, potency, cannabinoid profile and contaminants. Cannabis cultivators shall be subject to any product labeling requirements promulgated by the commission or otherwise required by law.

License required. No person or entity shall engage in activities described in this section without a cultivator license issued pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-8.
Moratorium report.

If the commission determines that the moratorium on issuing cultivator licenses is preventing an adequate supply of cannabis to fulfill the market demand pursuant to chapters 28.6 and 28.11 of this title, then the commission shall report the basis of the determination to the speaker of the house, the president of the senate and the governor.

No later than May 1, 2024, the commission shall conduct and deliver to the governor, the speaker of the house and the president of the senate, a study relating to the impact of the moratorium imposed pursuant to §

21-28.11-7

on the availability of cannabis for medical marijuana and adult use sales, and the projected need for the issuance of additional cultivator licenses to satisfy projected market needs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-9.
Cannabis product manufacturer or wholesaler.

A cannabis product manufacturer or processor or wholesaler that does not hold a cannabis cultivator’s license shall have a cannabis product manufacturer’s license issued by the commission. A cannabis product manufacturer licensee may purchase cannabis from cultivators for processing and shall only transfer or sell cannabis products to other entities licensed pursuant to this chapter or chapter 28.6 of this title. A cannabis product manufacturer’s licensee or processor or wholesaler shall report to the commission, pursuant to regulations, the purchase or acquisition and the sale or transfer of all cannabis and cannabis products.

To qualify and hold a cannabis product manufacturer’s license under this section the applicant shall satisfy all qualifications established by the commission to include, but not be limited to the following:

Apply for a license in a manner prescribed by the commission;

Provide proof that the applicant is twenty-one (21) years of age or older and is a resident of the state;

Undergo a criminal record background check pursuant to §

21-28.11-12.1

and on any terms established by the commission;

Provide proof that the applicant is current and in compliance with all obligations for filings and payments for taxes with the division of taxation;

Has provided a nonrefundable application fee as determined by the commission and promulgated by rules and regulations; and

Prior to issuance of any license and for any period of renewal, the applicant shall submit an annual license fee as determined by the commission and promulgated by rules and regulations to be deposited in the social equity fund established in § 21-28.1-31.

A cannabis product manufacturer or processor or wholesaler and all agents and employees shall comply with all rules adopted by the commission and all applicable laws.

The commission may adjust the application fee or annual license fee pursuant to the commission’s rulemaking authority and in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

As a condition of licensing, cannabis product manufacturers or processors or wholesalers shall consent and be subject to inspections by the commission for the purposes of ensuring and enforcing compliance with this chapter and all rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, and pursuant to the provisions of §

21-28.11-20

.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing a cannabis product manufacturer or processor or wholesaler to transfer or sell cannabis to a consumer. A direct sale or transfer from a cannabis product manufacturer licensee to a consumer is prohibited.

No cannabis or cannabis product shall be sold or otherwise marketed pursuant to this chapter that has not first been tested by a cannabis testing laboratory and determined to meet the commission’s testing protocols issued pursuant to §

21-28.11-11

.

Persons issued cannabis product manufacturer’s licenses shall be subject to the following:

A licensed cannabis product manufacturer shall notify and request approval from the commission of any change in his or her name or address within ten (10) days of the change. A licensed cannabis product manufacturer who fails to notify the commission of any of these changes shall be subject to an administrative fine of no more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) or other penalty as determined by the commission.

When a licensed cannabis product manufacturer notifies the commission of any changes listed in this subsection, the commission shall issue the licensed cannabis product manufacturer a new registry identification document after the department approves the changes and receives from the licensee payment of a fee specified in regulation.

If a licensed cannabis product manufacturer loses his or her document, he or she shall notify the commission and submit a fee specified in regulation not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100), within ten (10) days of losing the document. The commission shall issue a new license with a new random identification number.

A licensed cannabis product manufacturer has a continuing duty to notify the commission of any criminal conviction(s) that occurs after the issuance of a license or registration. A criminal conviction relating solely to a cannabis offense shall not automatically result in suspension or revocation of a license, but shall be subject to §

21-28.11-12.1

.

If a licensed cannabis product manufacturer violates any provision of this chapter or regulations promulgated hereunder as determined by the commission, his or her issued license may be suspended and/or revoked in addition to any other enforcement action.

Immunity.

No licensed cannabis product manufacturer or wholesaler shall be subject to: arrest; prosecution; search or seizure, except as authorized pursuant to §§

21-28.11-20

and

21-28.11-27

and by subsection (e) of this section; or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or entity, solely for acting in accordance with this chapter, chapter 28.6 of this title and rules and regulations promulgated by the commission.

No principal officers, board members, agents, volunteers, or employees of a licensed cannabis product manufacturer or wholesaler shall be subject to arrest; prosecution; search or seizure, except as authorized pursuant to §§

21-28.11-20

and

21-28.11-27

and by subsection (e) of this section; or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or entity, solely for working for or with a licensed cannabis product manufacturer or wholesaler to engage in acts permitted by this chapter, chapter 28.6 of this title or rules and regulations promulgated by the commission.

No state employee or commission member shall be subject to arrest; prosecution; search or seizure, except as authorized pursuant to §§ 21-28.11-20 and 21-28.11-27 and by subsection (e) of this section; or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty, disciplinary action, termination, or loss of employee or pension benefits, for any and all conduct that occurs within the scope of his or her employment regarding the administration, execution, and/or enforcement of this chapter, chapter 28.6 of this title and rules and regulations promulgated by the commission, and the provisions of §§

9-31-8

and

9-31-9

shall be applicable to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-10.
Hybrid cannabis retailers.

On or after December 1, 2022, a compassion center licensed pursuant to the provisions of chapter 28.6 of this title, upon payment to the office of cannabis regulation of an hybrid cannabis retailer fee of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) to be deposited in the social equity fund, is permitted to sell adult use cannabis pursuant to the provisions of this chapter for a period of one year, subject to the following conditions:

The compassion center must be in good standing and maintain its compassion center license with the office of cannabis regulation pursuant to the provisions of chapter 28.6 of this title;

The compassion center shall make good faith efforts to ensure that the sale of cannabis for adult use as a hybrid cannabis retailer has no significant adverse effect on the medical marijuana program and patient needs; and

The compassion center shall post in a conspicuous place a copy of a certificate of authorization evidencing a license in good standing and payment of the hybrid cannabis retailer fee.

During the transitional period specified in §

21-28.11-10.1

, hybrid cannabis retailers shall comply with directives of state agencies, departments and offices exercising regulatory authority pursuant to §

21-28.11-10.1(b)

, and directives provided or issued by the commission to protect public health and public safety. Failure to comply with a rule or directive issued pursuant to provisions of this subsection and §

21-28.11-10.1(b)

, may result in a revocation or suspension of the authorization to conduct adult use cannabis sales as ordered by the commission or office of cannabis regulation.

Following the final issuance of the commission’s rules and regulations, hybrid cannabis retailers shall be subject to the commission’s rules and regulations for all sales authorization and renewals to include, but not limited to, any licensing requirements.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the general laws, a licensed compassion center authorized as a hybrid cannabis retailer pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and the rules and regulations promulgated by the commission shall be exempt from the requirements of chapter 28.6 of this title requiring registration as a not-for-profit corporation under chapter 6 of title 7, provided the compassion center maintains operation as a hybrid cannabis retailer in good standing with the commission. The commission may promulgate regulations or issue guidance to facilitate the transition from a not-for-profit corporation to a for-profit corporation or other entity, including, but not limited to, the requirement that the compassion center must update and/or resubmit licensing and application documents which reflect this change.

If the commission has failed to make final issuance of the commission’s rules and regulations after one year from the date the compassion center has paid the fee pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, then hybrid cannabis retailers shall be permitted to continue to engage in adult use cannabis sales upon payment of a monthly fee to the department of business regulation in the amount of ten thousand five hundred dollars ($10,500) for each month of operation following the one-year period provided in subsection (a) of this section. Upon final issuance of the commission’s rules and regulations, hybrid cannabis retailers shall comply with the provisions of the rules and regulations to maintain licensing and authorization to sell adult use cannabis in accordance with §

21-28.11-10.2

.

Notwithstanding any other general law, rule or regulation, after March 1, 2023, and in accordance with a timeline established by the commission, no hybrid cannabis retailer shall be authorized to sell medical marijuana to any patient with an out-of-state medical marijuana card who fails to possess and produce a valid government issued identification demonstrating residency in the same state that issued the medical marijuana card.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-10.1.
Transitional period and transfer of authority.

To protect public health and public safety, upon the effective date of this chapter [May 25, 2022] until final issuance of the commission’s rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, there shall exist a transitional period of regulatory and enforcement authority regarding the production, possession, regulation, distribution, sale and use of cannabis relating to the sale by hybrid cannabis retailers of adult use cannabis pursuant to §

21-28.11-10

.

During the transitional period, the office of cannabis regulation shall prescribe such forms, procedures, and requirements as necessary to facilitate the acquisition of hybrid retail and cultivation licenses by compassion centers and cultivators licensed pursuant to chapter 28.6 of this title.

Such forms, procedures, and requirements shall be posted on the website of the office of cannabis regulation no later than October 15, 2022, at which time an application period will commence. Applications shall be received, reviewed, and approved on a rolling basis provided that in no case shall an approved hybrid retailer begin adult use sales before December 1, 2022.

The forms, procedures, and requirements prescribed by the office of cannabis regulation shall incorporate, but shall not be limited to, the following:

Requirements pertaining to the physical premises of hybrid retail licensees. Where physically possible these shall include prospective licensee plans to physically separate marijuana and marijuana products designated for adult use and medical sales, respectively, in inventory, storage, and customer-facing floor and display areas; plans to physically separate sales areas for adult use and medical sales, which may be provided by a temporary or semi-permanent physical barrier; plans to provide and maintain a patient consultation area that will allow privacy for confidential consultation with qualifying patients; and plans to prioritize patient and caregiver identification verification and physical entry into retail areas in the event of capacity or other constraints; however, if the premises of a hybrid retail licensee does not allow the licensee to meet the requirements of this subsection or would cause undue hardship on the licensee, the office of cannabis regulation may authorize the hybrid retail licensee to conduct adult use sales at an adjunct location. In authorizing any such adjunct location, the office shall require, at a minimum, the following:

The adjunct location must be physically located within the same municipality and geographic zone;

The adjunct location must comply with all municipal zoning requirements and obtain municipal approval;

The approval of any adjunct location will not cause undue hardship upon another licensed cannabis retailer; and

In the instance that an adjunct location is approved by the office, the hybrid cannabis retailer shall not be permitted to engage in the sale of cannabis for adult use at more than one premises.

Requirements pertaining to inventory, product, and sales tracking. These shall include prospective licensee submission of plans to electronically separate finished marijuana products designated for medical or adult use sales in hybrid licensees’ inventory and sales tracking systems. If prospective hybrid licensees are conducting cultivation activities, they shall submit plans to distinguish between sales of marijuana or finished marijuana products at wholesale based on designation for medical or adult use sales.

Requirements relating to the maintenance of medical marijuana program service levels. These shall include prospective licensee submission of comprehensive policies and procedures detailing plans to maintain a sufficient quantity and variety of medical marijuana products, and if substitutions of medical marijuana products with adult use marijuana products are to be made, a justification for such substitutions. Prospective hybrid licensees shall also be required to designate an individual who will be primarily responsible for maintenance of medical marijuana program service levels and ongoing compliance with existing program requirements, rules, and regulations.

Requirements relating to operating plans, policies, and procedures. These shall include prospective licensee submission, maintenance of, and adherence to a set of written standard operating procedures that encompass both adult use and medical marijuana service lines. These operating plans and procedures shall take the form of an updated operations manual as currently required under medical marijuana program regulations and shall include, but not be limited to, policies and procedures relating to the maintenance of medical marijuana program service levels as defined in this section.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, all prospective and approved applicants for hybrid cannabis retailer and cannabis cultivator licenses under this chapter shall maintain compliance with the existing provisions of chapter 28.6 of this title of the general laws and the regulations promulgated thereunder until final issuance of the commission’s rules and regulations, including, but not limited to, existing restrictions and requirements related to financial disclosures; registration of owners, managers, key persons, agents, and employees; product testing; packaging and labeling; transportation; home delivery; and advertising.

Forms, procedures, and requirements relating to this transitional period may be amended by the office of cannabis regulation or the commission up until the final issuance of the commission’s regulations pursuant to the provisions of this chapter at which time the forms, procedures, and requirements will be superseded by the commission’s final rules and regulations.

Upon final issuance of the commission’s rules and regulations, the following shall occur:

All powers, duties and responsibilities of the department of business regulation and the office of cannabis regulation with respect to the regulation, administration and enforcement of the provisions of chapter 28.6 of this title shall be transferred to the commission or as designated by the commission to the cannabis office.

All powers, duties and responsibilities of the department of environmental management with respect to regulation, administration and enforcement of chapter 28.6 of this title shall be transferred to the commission or as designated by the commission to the cannabis office.

All powers, duties and responsibilities of the department of health with respect to regulation, administration and enforcement of chapter 28.6 of this title shall be transferred to the commission or as designated by the commission to the cannabis office, except for the following:

Administration of registry identification cards to qualified patients; and

Powers delegated to the department pursuant to this chapter or by rules and regulations of the commission.

There shall be established a “cannabis office” with the powers, duties and responsibilities authorized pursuant to §

21-28.11-18.1

.

All powers exercised by state agencies, departments and offices pursuant to the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section relating to transitional period authority shall cease.

Upon final issuance of the commission’s rules and regulations, whenever the term “office of cannabis regulation” appears in any general law or regulation, the term shall mean the “cannabis office” as defined in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-10.2.
Cannabis retail sales.

In addition to the hybrid cannabis retailer certificates that may be issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, after issuance of the final rules and regulations, the commission may grant twenty-four (24) retail licenses, subject to the following restrictions:

The retail licenses shall be issued pursuant to geographic zones as specified in §

21-28.11-10.3

.

No more than four (4) retail licenses exclusive of any hybrid cannabis retail certificate shall be permitted in each geographic zone; and

Of the four (4) retail licenses in each geographic zone:

One shall be reserved for a workers’ cooperative applicant; and

One shall be reserved for a social equity applicant.

Minimum qualifications. To qualify for issuance of a cannabis retail sales license under this section, an applicant shall satisfy all qualifications established by the commission to include, but not be limited to, the following:

Apply for a license in a manner prescribed by the commission;

Provide proof that the applicant is twenty-one (21) years of age or older and is a resident of the state;

Undergo a criminal record background check pursuant to §

21-28.11-12.1

and on any terms established by the commission;

Provide proof that the applicant is current and in compliance with all obligations for filings and payments for taxes with the division of taxation;

Demonstrate that the proposed location for the retail sale of cannabis complies with provisions of municipal zoning and regulations or has been approved by the municipality;

Paid a nonrefundable application fee as determined by the commission and promulgated by rules and regulations; and

Prior to issuance of any license and for any period of renewal, the applicant shall pay an annual fee of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) to be deposited in the social equity fund established in §

21-28.11-31

.

Compliance. A cannabis retail sales licensee and all agents and employees shall comply with all rules adopted by the commission and all applicable laws to include, but not limited to, chapter 5 of title 28 (the “fair employment practices act”).

Inspection. As a condition of licensing and pursuant to §

21-28.11-20

, cannabis retailers shall consent and be subject to inspections by the commission or designated personnel for the purposes of ensuring and enforcing compliance with this chapter, all rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter and all other applicable law, to include, but not be limited to, the provisions of title 44 (“taxation”), chapter 28 of this title (the “uniform controlled substance act”), and chapter 5 of title 28 (the “fair employment practices act”).

Testing. No cannabis or cannabis product shall be sold or otherwise marketed pursuant to this chapter that has not first been collected and tested by a cannabis testing laboratory and found to meet the testing protocols issued pursuant to regulations promulgated by the department of health and determined to meet the commission’s testing protocols issued pursuant to §

21-28.11-11

.

Minimum requirements. Persons issued cannabis retail licenses shall be subject to the following:

A licensed cannabis retailer shall notify and request approval from the commission of any change in his or her name or address within ten (10) days of the change. A licensed cannabis retailer who fails to notify the commission of any of these changes shall be subject to an administrative fine of no more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) or other penalty as determined by the commission;

When a licensed cannabis retailer notifies the commission of any changes listed in this subsection, the commission shall issue the licensed cannabis retailer a new license identification document after the commission approves the changes and receives from the licensee payment of a fee specified in regulation;

If a licensed cannabis retailer loses his or her license document, he or she shall notify the commission and submit a fee specified in regulation within ten (10) days of losing the document. The commission shall issue a new license document with a new random identification number upon payment of a fee promulgated in the rules and regulations not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100);

A licensed cannabis retailer has a continuing duty to notify the commission of any criminal conviction(s) that occurs after the issuance of a license or registration. A criminal conviction shall not automatically result in suspension or revocation of a license, but shall be subject to the provisions §

21-28.11-12.1

;

If a licensed cannabis retailer violates any provision of this chapter or regulations promulgated hereunder as determined by the commission, his or her issued license may be suspended and/or revoked.

Immunity.

No licensed cannabis retailer shall be subject to: arrest; prosecution; search or seizure, except as authorized pursuant to §§

21-28.11-20

and

21-28.11-27

and by subsection (d) of this section; or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or entity, solely for acting in accordance with this chapter and rules and regulations promulgated by the commission.

No principal officers, board members, agents, volunteers, or employees of a licensed cannabis retailer shall be subject to arrest; prosecution; search or seizure, except as authorized pursuant to §§

21-28.11-20

and

21-28.11-27

and by subsection (d) of this section; or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or entity, solely for working for or with a licensed cannabis retailer to engage in acts permitted by this chapter and rules and regulations promulgated by the commission.

No state employee or commission member shall be subject to arrest; prosecution; search or seizure, except as authorized pursuant to §§ 21-28.11-20 and 21-28.11-27 and by subsection (d) of this section; or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty, disciplinary action, termination, or loss of employee or pension benefits, for any and all conduct that occurs within the scope of his or her employment regarding the administration, execution, and/or enforcement of this chapter and rules and regulations promulgated by the commission, and the provisions of §§

9-31-8

and

9-31-9

shall be applicable to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-10.3.
Geographic zones.

For purposes of issuance of cannabis retail licenses by the commission pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the following geographic zones are established:

Zone 1 shall consist of the towns of Burrillville, Cumberland, Glocester, North Smithfield, Smithfield and the city of Woonsocket.

Zone 2 shall consist of the towns of Johnston, Lincoln and North Providence and the cities of Central Falls and Providence.

Zone 3 shall consist of the towns of Coventry, Foster, Scituate, West Greenwich and West Warwick.

Zone 4 shall consist of the towns of East Greenwich and North Kingstown and the cities of Cranston and Warwick.

Zone 5 shall consist of the towns of Charlestown, Exeter, Hopkinton, Narragansett, Richmond, South Kingstown and Westerly.

Zone 6 shall consist of the towns of Barrington, Bristol, Jamestown, Little Compton, Middletown, New Shoreham, Portsmouth, Tiverton and Warren and the cities of East Providence, Newport and Pawtucket.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.